New Jersey, session 222, S1835.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 3 of P.L.2019, c.5 (C.39:4-98.12) is amended to read as follows: 3.    a.  The driver of a motor vehicle shall not operate the motor vehicle at a speed in excess of: (1)   Twenty-five miles per hour on the northbound lanes of Route 130 between a point 300 feet south of the southerly curb line of Wood Street and Jacksonville Road in Burlington City, Burlington County; (2)   Twenty-five miles per hour on the southbound lanes of Route 130 between a point 400 feet north of the northerly curb line of East Federal Street and Wood Street in Burlington City, Burlington County; (3)   Thirty-five miles per hour on the northbound lanes of Route 130 between Lincoln Avenue and a point 300 feet south of the southerly curb line of Wood Street in Burlington City, Burlington County; and (4)   Thirty-five miles per hour on the southbound lanes of Route 130 between Logan Avenue and a point 400 feet north of the northerly curb line of East Federal Street in Burlington City, Burlington County. b.    The fine for a violation of this section shall be triple the amount of the fine for a violation of R.S.39:4-98.  Notwithstanding R.S.39:5-41, all fines imposed pursuant to this section shall be paid into the municipal treasury of the municipality in which the violation occurred to be used for pedestrian safety and law enforcement purposes. (cf:  P.L.2019, c.5, s.3) 2.    This act shall take effect 1[immediately] on the first day of the fourth month next following the date of enactment, except that the Administrative Office of the Courts may take any anticipatory administrative action in advance as shall be necessary for the implementation of this act1.